Utah, session 2026, HB120.
Section 1. Section 41-6a-1647 is enacted to read:41-6a-1647. Tail light obstruction prohibited -- Cargo carriers and bicycle racks.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Cargo carrier" means any device attached to a vehicle for the purpose of transporting cargo, luggage, or equipment, including:(i)a hitch-mounted cargo carrier;(ii)a cargo tray; and(iii)a cargo basket.(b)"Reflector" means a device designed to reflect light from another light source to provide visibility of the device.(c)"Tail light" or "tail lamp" means the rear lighting equipment required under Section 41-6a-1603.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), an individual may not operate a vehicle to which a cargo carrier is attached on a highway if the cargo carrier obscures, obstructs, or blocks a required tail light such that the tail light is not clearly visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear of the vehicle.(b) An individual may operate a vehicle as described in Subsection (2)(a) if the individual installs auxiliary lighting equipment and reflectors in accordance with Subsection (3).(3)(a)If an individual operates a vehicle on a highway with a cargo carrier that obscures, obstructs, or blocks a tail light, the individual shall install auxiliary lighting equipment and reflectors as described in Subsection (3)(b) and (c).(b)An individual required to install auxiliary lighting or reflectors required under Subsection (3)(a) shall:(i)mount or attach the auxiliary light onto the cargo carrier;(ii)ensure that the auxiliary lighting:(A)is wired to activate simultaneously with the vehicle's standard tail lights and brake lights; and(B)is red in color and visible from a distance of at least 500 feet to the rear; and(iii)meet or exceed the standards established by the Department of Public Safety under Section 41-6a-1601.(c)An individual required to install reflectors as described in Subsection (3)(a) shall ensure that the reflectors:(i)are red in color;(ii)are visible from a distance of at least 500 feet to the rear when illuminated by the headlights of a motor vehicle; and(iii)meet or exceed the standards established by the Department of Public Safety under Section 41-6a-1601.(4)(a)A violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed $100 for a first offense.(b)A second or subsequent violation within three years is punishable by a fine not to exceed $200.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.